New Jersey, session 222, A759.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Attorney General shall study the use facial recognition technology by law enforcement agencies and shall issue a report to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), concerning the use of the technology. The report shall be issued within six months of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The report shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  an assessment of the facial recognition technology available for use by law enforcement agencies and the feasibility of its use, including accuracy; (2)  a Statewide summary of any current use of facial recognition technology by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of generating police reports; and (3)  recommendations for implementing a Statewide policy applicable to State and local law enforcement agencies that governs the use of facial recognition technology. c.    As used in this section, facial recognition technology means a computer application which uses facial recognition algorithms to identify or verify a person from a digital image or a video frame from a video source. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.